Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5253
Small employer, defined.

Small employer shall mean any person, political subdivision, firm, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or association that is actively engaged in business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two and no more than fifty eligible employees, the majority of whom were employed within this state. In determining the number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of state taxation shall be considered one employer.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 31;

Laws 1995, LB 837, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 44.